Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1513
Remedial action, defined.

Remedial action shall mean any immediate or long-term response to a release or suspected release in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department or the State Fire Marshal, including tank testing only in conjunction with a release or suspected release, site investigation, site assessment, cleanup, restoration, mitigation, and any other action ordered by the department or the State Fire Marshal which is reasonable and necessary. Remedial action shall not include:

(1) Tank restoration, upgrading, replacement, or rehabilitation;

(2) Actions which do not minimize, eliminate, or clean up a release or suspected release to protect the public safety, health, and welfare or the environment; or

(3) Aesthetic improvements.

Costs of remedial action shall not include costs for the actions specified in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this section, loss of income, attorney's fees, or reimbursement for the responsible person's own time spent in planning and administering a corrective action plan.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1226, § 4.